Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2811
Accessories before the fact in capital cases; not bailable.

When any person shall appear to be committed by any judge or magistrate, and charged as accessory before the fact to any felony, the punishment whereof is capital, which felony shall be plainly and especially charged in the warrant of commitment, such person shall not be removed or bailed by virtue of sections 29-2801 to 29-2824, or in any other manner than as if said sections had not been enacted.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 363, p. 806;

R.S.1913, § 9257;

C.S.1922, § 10286;

C.S.1929, § 29-2811;

R.S.1943, § 29-2811;

Laws 2015, LB268, § 35;

Referendum 2016, No. 426.
The repeal of section 29-2811 by Laws 2015, LB 268, section 35, is not effective because of the vote on the referendum at the November 2016 general election.